hu: Füstölő típusa: Tölcsér; Púder; Gyanta; Bot; Egyéb
en: Incense type: Cone; Powder; Resin; Stick; Other
th: ประเภทธูป: กรวย; แบบผง; เรซิน; แท่ง; อื่นๆ
nl: Wierooktype: Kegel; Poeder; Hars; Stick; Andere
zh-CN: 香类型: 圆锥型; 粉末; 树脂; 棒/棍/签; 其他
vi: Loại nhang: Hình nón; Bột; Nhựa resin; Nén; Khác
it: Tipo di incenso: Cono; Polvere; Resina; Stick; Altro
de: Weihrauchtyp: Kegel; Puder; Harz; Stick; Sonstiges
fi: Suitsuketyyppi: Kartio; Jauhe; Hartsi; Tikku; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta kadila: Stožec; Prašek; Smola; Palčka; Drugo
es: Tipo de incienso: Cono; Polvo; Resina; Palillo; Otros
pt-PT: Tipo de incenso: Cone; Pó; Resina; Taco; Outro
el: Τύπος θυμιάματος: Κώνος; Σκόνη; Ρητίνη; Στικ; Άλλο
tr: Tütsü Türü: Koni; Pudra; Reçine; Sap; Diğer
ja: お香の種類: 円錐形; パウダー; レジン; スティック; その他
nb: Type røkelse: Kjegle; Pulver; Harpiks; Pinne; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de incenso: Cone; Pó; Resina; Vareta; Outro
ko: 향 종류: 원뿔; 가루; 수지; 막대; 기타
lt-LT: Smilkalų tipas: Kūgis; Milteliai; Derva; Lazdelė; Kita
bg-BG: Вид тамян: Конус; Пудра; Смола; Стик; Други
da: Røgelsestype: Kegle; Pulver; Harpiks; Pind; Andet
pl: Typ kadzidła: Stożek; Proszek; Żywica; Przypnij; Inne
ro-RO: Tip produs tămâie: Con; Pudră; Rășină; Băț; Altele
ru: Тип благовония: Конус; Порошок; Смола; Палочка; Другой
zh-TW: 香型: 錐體; 粉末; 樹脂; 棒狀; 其他
cs: Typ kadidla: Kužel; Prášek; Pryskyřice; Tyčinka; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta mirisnog štapića: Konus; Prah; Smola; Štapić; Ostalo
fr: Type d’encens: Cône; Poudré; Résine; Bâton; Autre
sv: Typ av rökelse: Kon; Pulver; Harts; Stift; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ kadidla: Kužeľ; Prášok; Živica; Tyčinka; Iné